Illinois, session 104th, SB3281.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 26-4 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/26-4)  (from Ch. 38, par. 26-4)7    Sec. 26-4. Unauthorized video recording and live video 8transmission. 9    (a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make a video 10record or transmit live video of another person without that 11person's consent in a restroom, tanning bed, tanning salon, 12locker room, changing room, or hotel bedroom.13    (a-5) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make a 14video record or transmit live video of another person in that 15other person's residence without that person's consent.16    (a-6) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make a 17video record or transmit live video of another person in that 18other person's residence without that person's consent when 19the recording or transmission is made outside that person's 20residence by use of an audio or video device that records or 21transmits from a remote location. 22    (a-10) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make a 23video record or transmit live video of another person's   SB3281- 2 -LRB104 14409 RLC 27546 b1intimate parts for the purpose of viewing the body of or the 2undergarments worn by that other person without that person's 3consent. For the purposes of this subsection (a-10), "intimate 4parts" means the fully unclothed, partially unclothed, or 5transparently clothed genitals, pubic area, anus, or if the 6person is female, a partially or fully exposed nipple, 7including exposure through transparent clothing. 8    (a-15) It is unlawful for any person to place or cause to 9be placed a device that makes a video record or transmits a 10live video in a restroom, tanning bed, tanning salon, locker 11room, changing room, or hotel bedroom with the intent to make a 12video record or transmit live video of another person without 13that person's consent.14    (a-20) It is unlawful for any person to place or cause to 15be placed a device that makes a video record or transmits a 16live video with the intent to make a video record or transmit 17live video of another person in that other person's residence 18without that person's consent.19    (a-25) It is unlawful for any person to, by any means, 20knowingly disseminate, or permit to be disseminated, a video 21record or live video that he or she knows to have been made or 22transmitted in violation of subsection (a), (a-5), (a-6), 23(a-10), (a-15), or (a-20), or (a-30). 24    (a-30)(1) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly, 25without the consent of another person, operate an unmanned 26aerial vehicle in a manner that:  SB3281- 3 -LRB104 14409 RLC 27546 b1        (A) is intended to cause the unmanned aerial vehicle 2    to enter the space above or surrounding the other person's 3    occupied residence for the purpose of making a video 4    record or transmitting live video, or audio recordings of 5    the other person while the other person is:6             (i) within his or her occupied residence; or7            (ii) on the land or premises on which his or her 8        occupied residence is located; and9        (B) invades the other person's reasonable expectation 10    of privacy. 11    (2) It is unlawful for the person to knowingly disseminate 12a video record or live video made in violation of 13subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of this subsection 14(a-30). 15    (b) Exemptions. The following activities shall be exempt 16from the provisions of this Section:17        (1) The making of a video record or transmission of 18    live video by law enforcement officers pursuant to a 19    criminal investigation, which is otherwise lawful;20        (2) The making of a video record or transmission of 21    live video by correctional officials for security reasons 22    or for investigation of alleged misconduct involving a 23    person committed to the Department of Corrections; and24        (3) The making of a video record or transmission of 25    live video in a locker room by a reporter or news medium, 26    as those terms are defined in Section 8-902 of the Code of   SB3281- 4 -LRB104 14409 RLC 27546 b1    Civil Procedure, where the reporter or news medium has 2    been granted access to the locker room by an appropriate 3    authority for the purpose of conducting interviews. 4    (c) The provisions of this Section do not apply to any 5sound recording or transmission of an oral conversation made 6as the result of the making of a video record or transmission 7of live video, and to which Article 14 of this Code applies.8    (d) Sentence.9        (1) A violation of subsection (a-15) or (a-20) is a 10    Class A misdemeanor.11        (2) A violation of subsection (a), (a-5), (a-6), or 12    (a-10) is a Class 4 felony. 13        (3) A violation of subsection (a-25) is a Class 3 14    felony.15        (4) A violation of subsection (a), (a-5), (a-6), 16    (a-10), (a-15) or (a-20) is a Class 3 felony if the victim 17    is a person under 18 years of age or if the violation is 18    committed by an individual who is required to register as 19    a sex offender under the Sex Offender Registration Act.20        (5) A violation of subsection (a-25) is a Class 2 21    felony if the victim is a person under 18 years of age or 22    if the violation is committed by an individual who is 23    required to register as a sex offender under the Sex 24    Offender Registration Act. 25    (e) For purposes of this Section: 26        (1) "Residence" includes a rental dwelling, but does   SB3281- 5 -LRB104 14409 RLC 27546 b1    not include stairwells, corridors, laundry facilities, or 2    additional areas in which the general public has access. 3        (1.5) "Unmanned aerial vehicle" means an aircraft that 4    does not carry a human operator and that is capable of 5    flight under remote control or autonomous programming. 6    "Unmanned aerial vehicle" includes the following: 7            (A) an unmanned aircraft and an unmanned aircraft 8        system (both as defined in Section 331 of Public Law 9        112-95); and10            (B) a small unmanned aircraft and a small unmanned 11        aircraft system (both as defined in 14 CFR 107.3). 12        (2) "Video record" means and includes any videotape, 13    photograph, film, or other electronic or digital recording 14    of a still or moving visual image; and "live video" means 15    and includes any real-time or contemporaneous electronic 16    or digital transmission of a still or moving visual image. 17(Source: P.A. 102-567, eff. 1-1-22.)